Illinois, session 104th, SB323.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Find Our Children Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 57/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Find 8Our Children Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-484, eff. 8-8-05.)